Georgia statutes. TITLE 7 Banking And Finance
PART 10 Change in Control of Financial Institutions

Cross references.

Requirement that department approve of merger or consolidation of state banks or trust companies, §

7-1-534

.

Requirement that department approve mergers, consolidations, and other activities involving national banks, §

7-1-550

et seq.

7-1-230.
Definitions.

As used in this part, the term:

“Concert with one or more persons” includes, but is not limited to, the following persons and relationships:

A company and any controlling shareholder, partner, trustee, or management official of the company if both the company and the individual own voting securities of the financial institution;

An individual and the individual’s immediate family;

Companies under common control;

Persons that are parties to any agreement, contract, understanding, or other arrangement, whether written or otherwise, regarding the acquisition, voting, or transfer of control of voting securities of a financial institution;

Persons that have made, or propose to make, a joint filing under Section 13 or 14 of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934 and the rules promulgated thereunder by the United States Securities and Exchange Commission; and

A person and any trust for which the person serves as trustee.

“Control” means the power directly or indirectly to direct the management or policies of a financial institution or to vote 25 percent or more of any class of voting securities of a financial institution.

“Person” means an individual or a corporation, partnership, trust, association, joint venture, pool, syndicate, sole proprietorship, unincorporated organization, or any other form of entity not specifically listed in this paragraph.

“Presumption of control” means a person which directly or indirectly owns, controls, or has the power to vote more than 10 percent but less than 25 percent of any class of voting securities of a financial institution if no other persons will own, control, or hold the power to vote a greater percentage of that class of voting securities immediately after the transaction.

History.

Code 1933, § 41A-1005, enacted by Ga. L. 1980, p. 1076, § 1; Ga. L. 2022, p. 220, § 2/HB 891.

The 2022 amendment,

effective July 1, 2022, added paragraph (1), redesignated former paragraphs (1) and (2) as paragraphs (2) and (3), and added paragraph (4).

7-1-231.
“Financial institution” defined; acquisition of control without permission prohibited

For purposes of this Code section, the term “financial institution” shall include any “bank holding company” as such term is defined in subsection (a) of Code Section 7-1-605.

It shall be unlawful for a person, acting directly or indirectly or through concert with one or more persons, to acquire control or the presumption of control of any financial institution through a purchase, assignment, pledge, or other disposition of voting stock of such institution, except with the approval of the department or as otherwise permitted by this part.

History.

Code 1933, § 41A-1001, enacted by Ga. L. 1980, p. 1076, § 1; Ga. L. 2022, p. 220, § 3/HB 891.

The 2022 amendment,

effective July 1, 2022, added subsection (a), redesignated the existing provisions of this Code section as subsection (b), and inserted “or the presumption of control” in subsection (b).

Cross references.

Requirement that department be notified of change in ownership of or right to vote outstanding shares of bank or trust company which will result in control or change in control of the bank or trust company, §

7-1-236

.

7-1-232.
Notice of proposed acquisition required; approval or disapproval by department; judicial review.

For purposes of this Code section, the term “financial institution” shall include any “bank holding company” as that term is defined in subsection (a) of Code Section 7-1-605.

The department shall be given at least 60 days’ prior written notice of any such proposed acquisition. The department may extend the period during which a disapproval may issue for another 30 days. The period for disapproval may be further extended only if the department determines that any acquiring party has not furnished all the information required under Code Section 7-1-233 or that in its judgment any material information submitted is substantially inaccurate. An acquisition may be made prior to expiration of the disapproval period if the department issues written notice of its intent not to disapprove the action.

Within three days after its decision to disapprove any proposed acquisition, the department shall notify the acquiring party in writing of the disapproval. Such notice shall provide a statement of the basis for the disapproval.

Within ten days of receipt of such notice of disapproval, the acquiring party may request a hearing on the proposed acquisition. At the conclusion thereof, the department shall by order approve or disapprove the proposed acquisition on the basis of the record made at such hearing.

Any person whose proposed acquisition is disapproved after a department hearing under this Code section may obtain review in accordance with Code Section 7-1-90.

History.

Code 1933, § 41A-1002, enacted by Ga. L. 1980, p. 1076, § 1; Ga. L. 2022, p. 220, § 4/HB 891.

The 2022 amendment,

effective July 1, 2022, rewrote the second sentence in subsection (b), which read: “If the department does not issue a notice disapproving the proposed acquisition within that time or extend the period during which a disapproval may issue for another 30 days, the proposed acquisition shall stand approved.”.

Cross references.

Time for giving notice to department of change in control of bank or trust company resulting from change in ownership of or right to vote outstanding shares of the bank or trust company, §

7-1-236

.

7-1-233.
Contents of notice.

Except as otherwise provided by regulation of the department, a notice filed pursuant to Code Section 7-1-232 shall contain the following information:

The identity, personal history, business background, and experience of each person by whom or on whose behalf the acquisition is to be made, including his material business activities and affiliations during the past five years and a description of any material pending legal or administrative proceedings in which he is a party and any criminal indictment or conviction of such person by a state or federal court;

A statement of the assets and liabilities of each person by whom or on whose behalf the acquisition is to be made, as of the end of the fiscal year for each of the five fiscal years immediately preceding the date of the notice, together with related statements of income and source and application of funds for each of the fiscal years then concluded, all prepared in accordance with generally accepted accounting principles consistently applied, and an interim statement of the assets and liabilities for each such person, together with related statements of income and source and application of funds, as of a date not more than 90 days prior to the date of the filing of the notice;

The terms and conditions of the proposed acquisition and the manner in which the acquisition is to be made;

The identity, source, and amount of the funds or other considerations used or to be used in making the acquisition and, if any part of these funds or other considerations has been or is to be borrowed or otherwise obtained for the purpose of making the acquisition, a description of the transaction, the names of the parties, and any arrangements, agreements, or understandings with such persons;

Any plans or proposals which any acquiring party making the acquisition may have to liquidate the financial institution, to sell its assets or merge it with any company, or to make any other major change in its business or corporate structure or management;

The identification of any person employed, retained, or to be compensated by the acquiring party or by any person on his behalf to make solicitations or recommendations to stockholders for the purpose of assisting in the acquisition and a brief description of the terms of such employment, retainer, or arrangement for compensation;

Copies of all invitations or tenders or advertisements making a tender offer to stockholders for purchase of their stock to be used in connection with the proposed acquisition; and

Any additional relevant information in such forms as the department may require by regulation or by specific request in connection with any particular notice.

History.

Code 1933, § 41A-1003, enacted by Ga. L. 1980, p. 1076, § 1; Ga. L. 2022, p. 220, § 5/HB 891.

The 2022 amendment,

effective July 1, 2022, substituted “financial institution” for “bank” in paragraph (5).

7-1-234.
Grounds for disapproving proposal.

The department may disapprove any proposed acquisition if:

The proposed acquisition of control would result in a monopoly or would be in furtherance of any combination or conspiracy to monopolize or attempt to monopolize the business of banking in any part of this state;

The effect of the proposed acquisition of control in any section of this state may be substantially to lessen competition or to tend to create a monopoly or the proposed acquisition of control would in any other manner be in restraint of trade and the anticompetitive effects of the proposed acquisition of control are not clearly outweighed in the public interest by the probable effect of the transaction in meeting the convenience and needs of the community to be served;

The financial condition of any acquiring person is such as might jeopardize the financial stability of the financial institution or prejudice the interests of the depositors of the financial institution;

The competence, experience, or integrity of any acquiring person or of any of the proposed management personnel indicates that it would not be in the interest of the depositors of the financial institution or in the interest of the public to permit such person to control the financial institution;

Any acquiring person neglects, fails, or refuses to furnish the department all the information required by it;

In the case of trust companies, any individual who exercises control of a person that submits an application for approval under Code Section 7-1-232 has unsatisfactory results from a fingerprint record check report conducted by the Georgia Crime Information Center and the Federal Bureau of Investigation. The department shall be authorized to obtain conviction data with respect to any individual who exercises control of a person that submits an application for approval under Code Section 7-1-232, and such individual shall provide express written consent to the department to conduct a criminal background check and to use all information necessary to run such check, including, but not limited to, a classifiable set of fingerprints. The individual who exercises control of a person that submits an application for approval pursuant to Code Section 7-1-232 shall be responsible for all fees associated with the performance of such criminal background check. Upon receipt of fingerprints, fees, and other required information, the Georgia Crime Information Center shall transmit the necessary information to the Federal Bureau of Investigation for a search of its records; or

In the case of trust companies, any acquiring person or an individual who is a director or officer of such person has failed to demonstrate financial responsibility, character, and general fitness. The department shall be authorized to obtain personal history and work experience and other information, including, but not limited to, independent credit reports obtained from a consumer reporting agency described in the federal Fair Credit Reporting Act, 15 U.S.C. Section 1681a(f) with respect to such acquiring person and an individual who is a director or officer of such person.

History.

Code 1933, § 41A-1004, enacted by Ga. L. 1980, p. 1076, § 1; Ga. L. 2019, p. 828, § 4/HB 185; Ga. L. 2020, p. 320, § 1/HB 781; Ga. L. 2020, p. 493, § 7/SB 429; Ga. L. 2021, p. 323, § 2/HB 111; Ga. L. 2022, p. 220, § 6/HB 891.

The 2019 amendment,

effective July 1, 2019, deleted “or” from the end of paragraph (4), substituted a semicolon for a period at the end of paragraph (5), and added paragraphs (6) and (7).

The 2020 amendments.

The first 2020 amendment, effective January 1, 2021, rewrote paragraph (6), which read: “In the case of trust companies, any acquiring person or an individual that is a director or officer of such person has unsatisfactory results from a fingerprint record check report conducted by the Georgia Crime Information Center and the Federal Bureau of Investigation. The department shall be authorized to obtain conviction data with respect to any acquiring person or an individual that is a director or officer of such person, and such acquiring person or an individual that is a director or officer of such person shall provide express written consent to the department to conduct a criminal background check and to use all information necessary to run such check, including, but not limited to, a classifiable set of fingerprints. The acquiring person or an individual that is a director or officer of such person shall be responsible for all fees associated with the performance of such criminal background check; or”. The second 2020 amendment, effective July 29, 2020, part of an Act to revise, modernize, and correct the Code, substituted “individual who is” for “individual that is” throughout paragraphs (6) and (7).

The 2021 amendment,

effective July 1, 2021, rewrote paragraph (6), which read: “In the case of trust companies, any individual who is an acquiring party under Code Section 7-1-232 or an individual who is a director or officer of an acquiring party under Code Section 7-1-232 has unsatisfactory results from a fingerprint record check report conducted by the Georgia Crime Information Center and the Federal Bureau of Investigation. The department shall be authorized to obtain conviction data with respect to any individual who is an acquiring party or an individual who is a director or officer of an acquiring party, and such individual who is an acquiring party or an individual who is a director or officer of an acquiring party shall provide express written consent to the department to conduct a criminal background check and to use all information necessary to run such check, including, but not limited to, a classifiable set of fingerprints. The individual who is an acquiring party or an individual who is a director or officer of an acquiring party shall be responsible for all fees associated with the performance of such criminal background check; or”.

The 2022 amendment,

effective July 1, 2022, substituted “financial institution” for “bank” twice each in paragraphs (3) and (4).

7-1-235.
Part inapplicable to bank holding company transactions.

This part shall not apply to a transaction subject to Code Sections 7-1-605 through 7-1-608, relating to bank holding companies.

History.

Code 1933, § 41A-1006, enacted by Ga. L. 1980, p. 1076, § 1; Ga. L. 1984, p. 22, § 7.

7-1-236.
Report of change in control.

Whenever a change occurs in the ownership of or right to vote the outstanding shares of any bank or trust company which will result in the control or a change in the control of the bank or trust company, the president or other officer of such bank or trust company shall, within ten days after knowledge thereof, report such facts to the department. Notwithstanding Code Section 7-1-230, as used in this Code section, the term “control” means the power to direct or cause, directly or indirectly, the direction of the management or policies of the institution. If there is any doubt as to whether a change in the ownership or voting rights of such shares is sufficient to result in control thereof or to effect a change in the control thereof, such doubt shall be resolved in favor of reporting the facts to the department.

History.

Code 1933, § 13-2006, enacted by Ga. L. 1965, p. 524, § 1; Code 1933, § 41A-2013, enacted by Ga. L. 1974, p. 705, § 1; Code 1981, § 7-1-442; Code 1981, §

7-1-236

, as redesignated by Ga. L. 1986, p. 458, § 3; Ga. L. 2022, p. 220, § 7/HB 891.

The 2022 amendment,

effective July 1, 2022, substituted “Notwithstanding Code Section 7-1-230, as” for “As” at the beginning of the second sentence.

Cross references.

Procedure for giving notice to department of proposed change in control of financial institution, §

7-1-230

et seq.

Editor’s notes.

Ga. L. 1986, p. 458, § 3, redesignated former Code Section 7-1-442 as present Code Section 7-1-236.